Utah statutes.
19-3-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Radiation Control Board created under Section 19-1-106.
(2) (a)  "Broker" means a person who performs one or more of the following
functions for a generator:
(i)  arranges for transportation of the radioactive waste;
(ii)  collects or consolidates shipments of radioactive waste; or
(iii)  processes radioactive waste in some manner.
(b)  "Broker" does not include a carrier whose sole function is to transport
the radioactive waste.
(3)  "Byproduct material" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
2014(e)(2).
(4)  "Class B and class C low-level radioactive waste" has the same meaning as
in 10 CFR 61.55.
(5)  "Executive secretary" means the executive secretary of the board.
(6)  "Generator" means a person who:
(a) possesses any material or component:
(i)  that contains radioactivity or is radioactively contaminated; and
(ii)  for which the person foresees no further use; and
(b)  transfers the material or component to:
(i)  a commercial radioactive waste treatment or disposal facility; or
(ii)  a broker.
(7) (a)  "High-level nuclear waste" means spent reactor fuel assemblies,
dismantled nuclear reactor components, and solid and liquid wastes from fuel
reprocessing and defense-related wastes.
(b)  "High-level nuclear waste" does not include medical or institutional
wastes, naturally-occurring radioactive materials, or uranium mill tailings.
(8) (a)  "Low-level radioactive waste" means waste material which contains
radioactive nuclides emitting primarily beta or gamma radiation, or both, in
concentrations or quantities which exceed applicable federal or state
standards for unrestricted release.
(b)  "Low-level radioactive waste" does not include waste containing more than
100 nanocuries of transuranic contaminants per gram of material, nor spent
reactor fuel, nor material classified as either high-level waste or waste
which is unsuited for disposal by near-surface burial under any applicable
federal regulations.
(9)  "Radiation" means ionizing and nonionizing radiation, including gamma
rays, X-rays, alpha and beta particles, high speed electrons, and other
nuclear particles.
(10)  "Radioactive" means any solid, liquid, or gas which emits radiation
spontaneously from decay of unstable nuclei.
